Colorado, session 2026A, HB1379.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-4-111, amend (7)
as follows:
16-4-111. Disposition of security deposits upon forfeiture or
termination of bond.
(7) On and after July 1, 2008, all moneys ALL MONEY collected from
payment toward a judgment entered for the state pursuant to paragraph (b)
of subsection (1) SUBSECTION (3) of this section shall be transmitted to the
state treasurer for deposit in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
section 13-32-101 (6). C.R.S.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1379